Utah statutes.
59-2-105.   Situs of public utilities, bridges, ferries, and canals.
Public utilities, and bridges and ferries not public utilities, when operated
wholly in one county, and electric light lines and similar improvements,
canals, ditches, and flumes when separately taxable, shall be listed and
assessed in the county in which the property is located.
